California statutes. Elections Code
 county voter information guide. The party chairperson shall provide a written copy of the list of candidates endorsed by the party not later than 83 days before the election at which the candidate for a voter-nominated office will appear on the ballot.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 422, Sec. 67.   (AB 2911)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

13303.

(a) For each election, each appropriate elections official shall cause to be printed, on plain white paper or tinted paper, without watermark, at least as many copies of the form of ballot provided for use in each voting precinct as there are voters in the precinct. These copies shall be designated “county voter information guide” upon their face and shall include a substantial facsimile of the official ballots used in the election, except as otherwise provided by law. A county voter information guide shall be mailed, postage prepaid, no later than 21 days before the election to each voter who is registered at least 29 days before the election.

(b) The elections official shall send
 notice of the polling place, which includes vote centers, to each voter with the county voter information guide. Only official matter shall be sent out with the county voter information guide as provided by law.

(c) The elections official shall send notice of the polling place, which includes vote centers, to each voter who registered after the 29th day before the election and is eligible to participate in the election. The notice shall also include information as to where the voter can obtain a county voter information guide and a state voter information guide before the election, a statement indicating that those documents will be available at the polling place at the time of the election, and the address of the Secretary of State’s internet website and, if applicable, of the county internet website where a county voter information guide may be
 viewed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 566, Sec. 3.   (SB 151)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

13304.

The notice of the polling place which is sent to each voter as provided in Section 13303 may, at the option of the local elections official, inform the voter as to whether the polling place is accessible to the physically handicapped. In addition, this notice may inform the voter of his or her rights under Section 14282, if applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 72, Sec. 2.   Effective July 19, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

13305.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 13300 and 13303 a county elections official may elect not to mail a county voter information guide to a voter if both of the following are satisfied:

(1) The county elections official prepares and mails to each voter a document that includes all of the information required to be included in, and shall be accompanied by all the election materials required to accompany, the county voter information guide.

(2) The voter is furnished with an official ballot pursuant to Section 3005 or 3010.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a)
 of Section 13303, for each voter to whom the elections official elects not to mail a county voter information guide pursuant to subdivision (a), the elections official may cause to be printed one less copy of the county voter information guide.

(c) If a county elections official elects not to mail a county voter information guide to a voter pursuant to this section, the elections official shall use any savings achieved to offset the costs associated with establishing a free access system for vote by mail ballots pursuant to Section 3019.5 before the savings may be used for any other purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 161, Sec. 27.   (AB 2608)   Effective August 22, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

13306.

Notwithstanding Sections 13300, 13303, and 13307, county voter information guides and candidates’ statements need not be mailed to voters who registered after the 54th day before an election, but all of these voters shall receive polling place notices and state voter information guides. A state voter information guide is not required to be mailed to a voter who registered after the 29th day
 before an election. Each of these voters shall receive a notice in bold print that states: “Because you are a late registrant, you are not receiving a county voter information guide or candidates’ statements.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 422, Sec. 70.   (AB 2911)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

13307.

(a) (1) Each candidate for nonpartisan elective office in any local agency, including any city, county, city and county, or district, may prepare a candidate’s statement on an appropriate form provided by the elections official. The statement may include the name, age, and occupation of the candidate and a brief description, of no more than 200 words, of the candidate’s own education and qualifications expressed by the candidate. However, the governing body of the local agency may authorize an increase in the limitations on words for the statement from 200 to 400 words. The statement shall not include the party affiliation of the candidate, nor membership or activity in partisan political organizations.

(2) The statement authorized by this subdivision shall be filed in the office of the elections official when the candidate’s nomination papers are returned for filing, if it is for a primary election, or for an election for offices for which there is no primary. The statement shall be filed in the office of the elections official no later than the 88th day before the election, if it is for an election for which nomination papers are not required to be filed. If a runoff election or general election occurs within 88 days of the primary or first election, the statement shall be filed with the elections official by the third day following the governing body’s declaration of the results from the primary or first election.

(3) Except as provided in Section 13309, the statement may be withdrawn,
 but not changed, during the period for filing nomination papers and until 5 p.m. of the next working day after the close of the nomination period.

(b) (1) The elections official shall send to each voter a county voter information guide that contains the written statements of each candidate that is prepared pursuant to subdivision (a). The statement of each candidate shall be printed in type of uniform size and darkness, and with uniform spacing.

(2) The elections official shall provide a Spanish translation to those candidates who wish to have one, and shall select a person to provide that translation who is one of the following:

(A) A certified and registered interpreter on the Judicial Council Master
 List.

(B) An interpreter categorized as “certified” or “professionally qualified” by the Administrative Office of the United States Courts.

(C) From an institution accredited by a regional or national accrediting agency recognized by the United States Secretary of Education.

(D) A current voting member in good standing of the American Translators Association.

(E) A current member in good standing of the American Association of Language Specialists.

(c) (1) In addition to the statement prepared pursuant to subdivision (a), if the elections official who is conducting the election
 or the county elections official who is conducting a local agency’s election, including a local election that is consolidated with the county election, permits electronic distribution of a candidate’s statement, each candidate for nonpartisan elective office in the local agency may prepare a candidate’s statement for the purpose of electronic distribution pursuant to this subdivision.

(2) A statement prepared pursuant to this subdivision shall be posted on the website of the elections official, and may be included in a voter’s pamphlet that is electronically distributed by the elections official pursuant to Section 13300.7, but shall not be included in a voter’s pamphlet that is printed and mailed to voters pursuant to subdivision (b).

(3) A statement that is printed in the voter’s
 pamphlet and mailed to voters pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be included with the statement that is prepared and electronically distributed pursuant to this subdivision.

(4) A statement that is prepared and electronically distributed pursuant to this subdivision shall be displayed in type of uniform size and darkness, and with uniform spacing.

(5) The elections official shall provide a Spanish translation to those candidates who wish to have one, and shall select a person to provide that translation who is one of the persons listed in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b).

(d) The local agency may estimate the total cost of printing, handling, translating, mailing, and electronically distributing candidate’s
 statements filed pursuant to this section, including costs incurred as a result of complying with the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965, as amended. The local agency may require each candidate filing a statement to pay in advance to the local agency the candidate’s estimated pro rata share as a condition of having the candidate’s statement included in the county voter information guide or electronically distributed. In the event the estimated payment is required, the receipt for the payment shall
 include a written notice that the estimate is just an approximation of the actual cost that varies from one election to another election and may be significantly more or less than the estimate, depending on the actual number of candidates filing statements. Accordingly, the local agency is not bound by the estimate and may, on a pro rata basis, bill the candidate for additional actual expense or refund any excess paid depending on the final actual cost. In the event of underpayment, the local agency may require the candidate to pay the balance of the cost incurred. In the event of overpayment, the local agency that, or the elections official who, collected the estimated cost shall prorate the excess amount among the candidates and refund the excess amount paid within 30 days of the election.

(e) This section shall not be
 deemed to make any statement, or the authors of any statement, free or exempt from any civil or criminal action or penalty because of any false, slanderous, or libelous statements offered for printing electronic distribution pursuant to this section or contained in the county voter information guide.

(f) Before the nominating period opens, the local agency for that election shall determine whether a charge shall be levied against that candidate for the candidate’s statement sent to each voter and, if authorized pursuant to subdivision (c), for the electronically distributed candidate’s statement. This decision shall not be revoked or modified after the seventh day before the opening of the nominating period. A written statement of the regulations with respect to charges for handling, packaging, mailing, and electronic distribution shall
 be provided to each candidate or each candidate’s representative, at the time they pick up the nomination papers.

(g) For purposes of this section and Section 13310, the board of supervisors is the governing body of judicial elections.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 120, Sec. 2.   (AB 3197)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

13307.5.

A candidate for United States Representative may purchase the space to place a statement in the voter information portion of the county voter information guide that does not exceed 250 words. The statement shall not refer to any opponent of the candidate. The statement shall be submitted in accordance with the timeframes and procedures set forth in this code for the preparation of the voter information portion of the county voter information guide.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 422, Sec. 72.   (AB 2911)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

13307.7.

(a) An elections official shall post the form to be used by a candidate to submit a candidate statement pursuant to Section 13307, Section 13307.5, or subdivision (c) of Section 85601 of the Government Code, on the elections official’s internet website, and shall accept the electronic submission of that form if it is submitted in accordance with the times and procedures set forth in this code for the preparation of the voter information portion of the county voter information guide. If the candidate is running in a multicounty district, the elections official of each county shall accept the electronic submission of the form from the candidate’s county of residence; however, the candidate shall transmit a hard copy of the candidate statement form, any accompanying form, and payment of the requisite fee to each county by
 overnight mail within 72 hours of filing the statement electronically. The elections official shall not require the candidate to submit any additional forms as a means of correcting internet website posting errors made by the elections official.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), an elections official may require a candidate to provide additional information that the official needs to comply with state law and county voter information guide requirements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 664, Sec. 2.   (AB 773)   Effective October 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

13308.

In addition to the restrictions set forth in Section 13307, any candidate’s statement submitted pursuant to Section 13307 shall be limited to a recitation of the candidate’s own personal background and qualifications, and shall not in any way make reference to other candidates for that office or to another candidate’s qualifications, character, or activities. The elections official shall not cause to be printed, posted on an Internet Web site, or circulated any statement that the elections official determines is not so limited or that includes any reference prohibited by this
 section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 128, Sec. 2.   (AB 2010)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

13309.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 13307, if a candidate alleges to be indigent and unable to pay in advance the requisite fee for submitting a candidate statement, the candidate shall submit to the local agency a statement of financial worth to be used in determining whether or not he or she is eligible to submit a candidate statement without payment of the fee in advance.

(b) The statement of financial worth required by this section shall be submitted by the candidate together with his or her candidate statement in accordance with the deadline specified in Section 13307. The statement of financial worth form shall be furnished by the local agency, and
 may include questions relating to the candidate’s employer, income, real estate holdings, tangible personal property, and financial obligations. The candidate shall certify the content of the statement as to its truth and correctness under penalty of perjury. The candidate shall also sign a release form of the candidate’s most recent federal income tax report.

(c) Upon receipt of a statement of financial worth, a determination shall be made by the local agency of whether or not the candidate is indigent. The local agency shall notify the candidate of its findings.

(d) If it is determined that the candidate is not indigent, the candidate shall, within three days of the notification, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and state holidays, withdraw the statement or pay the requisite fee.
 If the candidate fails to respond within the time prescribed, the local agency shall not be obligated to print and mail the statement.

(e) If the local agency determines that the candidate is indigent, the local agency shall print and mail the statement.

(f) Nothing in this section shall prohibit the local agency from billing the candidate his or her actual pro rata share of the cost after the election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 560, Sec. 11.   (AB 1417)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

13310.

Prior to the nomination period for an election, the governing body of the local agency conducting the election may determine that Section 13307 is inapplicable to that election. This section shall become operative only if the United States Supreme Court or the California Supreme Court rules that candidates (other than indigent candidates) may not be required to pay for candidates’ statements authorized pursuant to Section 13307.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.   Section conditionally operative by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

13311.

Notwithstanding the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code), the statements filed pursuant to Section 13307 shall remain confidential until the expiration of the filing deadline.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 99.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

13312.

(a) Each county voter information guide prepared pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 13307 shall contain a notice in the heading of the first page, not smaller than 10-point type, that specifies both of the following:

(1) That the county voter information guide does not contain a complete list of candidates and that a complete list of candidates appears on the sample ballot (if any candidate is not listed in the county voter information guide).

(2) That each candidate’s statement in the county voter information guide is volunteered by the candidate and (if printed at the candidate’s expense) is printed at the candidate’s expense.

(b) If a local agency has authorized each candidate for nonpartisan elective office to prepare a candidate’s statement for the purpose of electronic distribution pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 13307, and if a candidate has submitted a statement for that purpose, the notice required by subdivision (a) shall specify that additional statements are available on the internet website of the elections official and shall include the internet website address at which the statements may be viewed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 56.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

13313.

(a) The elections official shall make a copy of the material referred to in Section 13307 available for public examination in the elections official’s office for a period of 10 calendar days immediately following the filing deadline for submission of those documents. Any person may obtain a copy of the candidate’s statements from the elections official for use outside of the elections official’s office. The elections official may charge a fee to any person obtaining a copy of the material, and the fee may not exceed the actual cost incurred by the elections official in providing the copy.

(b) (1) During the 10-calendar-day public examination period provided by this section, any voter of the jurisdiction in which the election is being held, or the elections official, himself or herself, may seek a writ of mandate or an injunction requiring any or all of the material in the candidates statements to be amended or deleted. The writ of mandate or injunction request shall be filed no later than the end of the 10-calendar-day public examination period.

(2) A peremptory writ of mandate or an injunction shall issue only upon clear and convincing proof that the material in question is false, misleading, or inconsistent with the requirements of this chapter, and that issuance of the writ or injunction will not substantially interfere with the printing or distribution of official election materials as provided by law.

(3) The elections official shall be named as respondent and the candidate who authored the material in question shall be named as the real party in interest. In the case of the elections official bringing the mandamus or injunctive action pursuant to this subdivision, the board of supervisors of the county shall be named as the respondent and the candidate who authored the material in question shall be named as the real party in interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 228, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

13314.

(a) (1) An elector may seek a writ of mandate alleging that an error or omission has occurred, or is about to occur, in the placing of a name on, or in the printing of, a ballot, county voter information guide, state voter information guide, or other official matter, or that any neglect of duty has occurred, or is about to occur.

(2) A peremptory writ of mandate shall issue only upon proof of both of the following:

(A) That the error, omission, or neglect is in violation of this code or the Constitution.

(B) That issuance of the writ will
 not substantially interfere with the conduct of the election.

(3) The action or appeal shall have priority over all other civil matters.

(4) The Secretary of State shall be named as a respondent or a real party in interest in any proceeding under this section concerning a measure or a candidate described in Section 15375, except for a candidate for judge of the superior court.

(b) Venue for a proceeding under this section shall be exclusively in Sacramento County in any of the following cases:

(1) The Secretary of State is named as a real party in interest or as a respondent.

(2) A candidate for
 statewide elective office is named as a party.

(3) A statewide measure that is to be placed on the ballot is the subject of the proceeding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 422, Sec. 74.   (AB 2911)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

13316.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, a county, city, city and county, or district using voting machines may use reasonable facsimiles of the county voter information guides sent to the voters of the local jurisdiction as vote by mail ballots.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 422, Sec. 76.   (AB 2911)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

13317.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, a county, city, city and county, or district using vote tabulating devices may use reasonable facsimiles of the county voter information guides sent to the voters of the local jurisdiction as vote by mail ballots.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 422, Sec. 77.   (AB 2911)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Facsimile Copies of Ballots [13400. - 13400.]

13400.

(a) A vote by mail voter may request that a facsimile copy of his or her ballot in the language of his or her preference be sent to him or her by regular mail or electronic mail if the voter lives in a precinct that requires a facsimile copy of the ballot in that language pursuant to Section 14201. The county elections officer shall
 provide instructions to vote by mail voters in the county voter information guide and on the county elections Internet Web site on how to request a facsimile copy of a ballot, in all languages that the county is required to provide facsimile copies of ballots. A vote by mail voter may request a facsimile copy of a ballot by telephone, mail, online, or when requesting a vote by mail ballot from the county no later than seven days before election day.

(b) The county elections official shall prepare the requested facsimile copies described in subdivision (a) no later than 10 days before election day. Requests received by the county elections official
 10 days or more before election day shall be processed by the 10th day prior to election day.

(c) This section does not limit an elections official from distributing facsimile copies of the ballot more widely than as required by subdivision (a) or earlier than required by subdivision (b).

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 845, Sec. 7.   (AB 918)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Partisan Primary Elections [13500. - 13502.5.]

13500.

This chapter applies only to partisan primary elections.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 819, Sec. 1.   (AB 837)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

13501.

(a) The Secretary of State shall include in the state voter information guide the information specified in subdivision (a) of Section 9083.5, including a statement explaining that a voter who has declined to disclose a political party preference may not vote in a political party’s primary election unless the political party has authorized a voter who has declined to disclose a political party preference to vote in its primary election.

(b) The Secretary of State shall make all of the following information available on the Secretary of State’s
 Internet Web site:

(1) A statement that a voter who has declined to disclose a political party preference may vote in a political party’s partisan primary election if the political party, by party rule duly noticed to the Secretary of State, authorizes a voter who has declined to disclose a political party preference to vote in the next ensuing partisan primary election.

(2) The name of each political party that authorizes a voter who has declined to disclose a political party preference to vote in the partisan primary election.

(3) A statement that a voter who has declined to disclose a political party preference may request the ballot of one of the political parties that authorizes a voter who has declined to disclose a political party preference to vote in the partisan primary election.

(c) A county elections official shall include all of the information described in paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of subdivision (b) in the nonpartisan county voter information guide prepared pursuant to Section 13300 and shall make the information available on the official’s Internet Web site. In addition, the county elections official shall send an email to the email address of a voter who has declined to disclose a political party preference notifying the voter that he or she may request a political party’s ballot at the next ensuing partisan primary election if the political party has so authorized. The county elections official shall also provide the notice to a voter who has declined to disclose a political party preference by text message if the voter has provided written consent to receive text messages from the county elections official.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 819, Sec. 1.   (AB 837)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

13502.

(a) With each nonpartisan vote by mail ballot that is sent to a voter who has declined to disclose a political party preference, the county elections official shall include a notice informing the voter that the voter may request a political party’s ballot at the next ensuing partisan primary election if the political party has so authorized.

(b) Prior to each partisan primary election, county elections officials shall mail to every voter who has declined to disclose a political party preference a notice and application regarding voting in the primary election.

(1) The notice shall inform the voter that the voter may request a
 vote by mail ballot for a particular political party for the primary election, if that political party adopted a party rule, duly noticed to the Secretary of State, authorizing these voters to vote in their primary election. The notice shall also contain a toll-free telephone number, established by the Secretary of State, that the voter may call to access information regarding which political parties have adopted such a rule.

 (2) The application shall contain a list of political parties that have authorized a voter who has declined to disclose a political party preference to vote that party’s ballot, and next to each party’s name, a box to mark indicating that the voter wishes to vote that party’s ballot. The application shall also require the voter to provide personal identifying information that matches the information contained on the
 voter’s affidavit of registration, including their first and last names, home address, and date of birth, and shall require the voter to sign the application. The notice or application shall instruct the voter that they may request a vote by mail ballot for the party they select by submitting the completed application to the appropriate county elections official in person, by mail, email, or facsimile transmission, or by other electronic means made available by the county elections official.

(c) In addition to the method specified in subdivision (b) and any other method permitted by law, a voter who has declined to disclose a political party preference may request the ballot of a political party that has authorized a voter who has declined to disclose a political party preference to vote in its partisan primary election as described in this
 subdivision. A voter requesting a ballot pursuant to this subdivision shall provide identifying information that matches the information contained on the voter’s affidavit of registration, including their date of birth, home address, and first and last names. If requesting a ballot pursuant to paragraph (3), the voter must also provide their signature. The voter may request a ballot as follows:

(1) By telephone subject to the following conditions:

(A) A person shall not request a party’s ballot pursuant to this section using the name of, or on behalf of, another person.

(B) Prior to being asked for personal identifying information, a voter requesting a party’s ballot pursuant to this section shall be advised as follows:
 “Only the registered voter themself may request a ballot from a political party. A request for a party’s ballot that is made by any person other than the voter is a criminal offense.”

(C) The voter’s signature shall not be required.

(2) On an application over the internet if available. The voter’s signature shall not be required.

(3) By a written statement application submitted in person, or by mail, email, or facsimile transmission.

(4) By text message to the appropriate elections official, if the county has established a system for processing such a request. The voter’s signature shall not be required.

(d) A voter who has declined to disclose a political party preference and who has received a nonpartisan vote by mail ballot may return their unvoted ballot to the county elections official and request and receive a vote by mail ballot, or appear to vote in person and receive a ballot, for a political party if the political party has authorized a voter who has declined to disclose a political party preference to vote in its partisan primary election.

(e) The Secretary of State shall prepare and distribute to county elections officials a uniform application format for a voter to request a political party’s ballot at the next ensuing partisan primary election if the political party has so authorized.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 646, Sec. 1.   (AB 292)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

13502.5.

(a) This section applies to a nonpartisan ballot provided to a voter who has declined to disclose a political party preference for use in voting in a presidential primary election.

(b) (1) A notice shall be printed on the ballot, in substantially the following form, that advises the voter of at least the following information:

(A) You are registered as a No Party Preference voter and therefore ineligible to vote for a presidential candidate unless you request and vote a partisan ballot.

(B) The following parties allow a No Party Preference voter
 to vote in their presidential primaries: [list of parties]. You may
 request a ballot to vote in one of these primaries from your county elections official.

(2) The notice printed on the ballot shall also advise the voter that they may find the additional information described in subdivision (c) in the voter information guide or on the county elections official’s internet website.

 (c) The notice printed on the ballot may advise the voter of additional information, including the following:

(1) A list of means available in the county for the voter to request a partisan ballot.

(2) A statement that if the voter wishes to vote in the presidential primary of a party that does not permit a No Party Preference voter to
 vote, the voter must update their voter registration and request the ballot of that party.

(3) A list of means available in the county for the voter to request a remote accessible vote by mail ballot, in case the voter is unable to request and receive a partisan ballot in time to return it for an upcoming election.

(4) A description of the county’s procedures for accepting and processing a remote accessible vote by mail ballot.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 80, Sec. 41.   (SB 1525)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Ballot Mistakes [13600. - 13600.]

13600.

The Secretary of State, in consultation with county elections officials, shall develop uniform standards and guidelines for a voter to correct mistakes made on the voter’s ballot. The Secretary of State may adopt appropriate regulations for the purpose of ensuring uniform application of the standards and guidelines.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 289, Sec. 1.   (AB 1072)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 14. ELECTION DAY PROCEDURES [14000. - 14443.]



CHAPTER 1. Privileges of Voters [14000. - 14004.]

14000.

(a) If a voter does not have sufficient time outside of working hours to vote at a statewide election, the voter may, without loss of pay, take off enough working time that, when added to the voting time available outside of working hours, will enable the voter to vote.

(b) No more than two hours of the time taken off for voting shall be without loss of pay. The time off for voting shall be only at the beginning or end of the regular working shift, whichever allows the most free time for voting and the least time off from the regular working shift, unless otherwise mutually agreed.

(c) If the employee on the third working day prior to the day of election, knows or has reason to believe that time off will be necessary to be able to vote on election day, the employee shall give the employer at least two working days’ notice that time off for voting is desired, in accordance with this section.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14001.

Not less than 10 days before every statewide election, every employer shall keep posted conspicuously at the place of work, if practicable, or elsewhere where it can be seen as employees come or go to their place of work, a notice setting forth the provisions of Section 14000.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14002.

Sections 14000, 14001, and 14004 shall apply to all public agencies and the employees thereof, as well as to employers and employees in private industry.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 223, Sec. 2.   (AB 17)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

14003.

Except in time of war or public danger, no voter is obliged to perform militia duty on any election day.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14004.

(a) An employer shall not require or request that an employee bring the employee’s vote by mail ballot to work or vote the employee’s vote by mail ballot at work.

(b) This section does not prohibit an employer from encouraging an employee to vote.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 223, Sec. 3.   (AB 17)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 1.5. Rights of Voters [14025. - 14032.]

14025.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the California Voting Rights Act of 2001.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 129, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

14026.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “At-large method of election” means any of the following methods of electing members to the governing body of a political subdivision:

(1) One in which the voters of the entire jurisdiction elect the members to the governing body.

(2) One in which the candidates are required to reside within given areas of the jurisdiction and the voters of the entire jurisdiction elect the members to the governing body.

(3) One that combines at-large elections with district-based elections.

(b) “District-based
 elections” means a method of electing members to the governing body of a political subdivision in which the candidate must reside within an election district that is a divisible part of the political subdivision and is elected only by voters residing within that election district.

(c) “Political subdivision” means a geographic area of representation created for the provision of government services, including, but not limited to, a general law city, general law county, charter city, charter county, charter city and county, school district, community college district, or other district organized pursuant to state law.

(d) “Protected class” means a class of voters who are members of a race, color, or language minority group, as this class is referenced and defined in the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10301 et seq.).

(e) “Racially polarized voting” means voting in which there is a difference, as defined in case law regarding enforcement of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10301 et seq.), in the choice of candidates or other electoral choices that are preferred by voters in a protected class, and in the choice of candidates and electoral choices that are preferred by voters in the rest of the electorate. The methodologies for estimating group voting behavior as approved in applicable federal cases to enforce the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10301 et seq.) to establish racially polarized voting may be used for purposes of this section to prove that elections are characterized by racially polarized voting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 121.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

14027.

An at-large method of election may not be imposed or applied in a manner that impairs the ability of a protected class to elect candidates of its choice or its ability to influence the outcome of an election, as a result of the dilution or the abridgment of the rights of voters who are members of a protected class, as defined pursuant to Section 14026.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 129, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

14028.
